Utah statutes.
58-68-802.   Form of practice.
(1)  An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter may
engage in practice as an osteopathic physician and surgeon or in the practice
of osteopathic medicine only as an individual licensee, but as an individual
licensee, he may be:
(a)  an individual operating as a business proprietor;
(b)  an employee of another person;
(c)  a partner in a lawfully organized partnership;
(d)  a lawfully formed professional corporation;
(e)  a lawfully organized limited liability company;
(f)  a lawfully organized business corporation; or
(g)  any other form of organization recognized by the state and not prohibited
by division rule made in collaboration with the board.
(2)  Regardless of the form in which a licensee engages in the practice of
osteopathic medicine, the licensee may only permit the practice of medicine in
that form of business practice to be conducted by an individual:
(a)  licensed in Utah as an osteopathic physician and surgeon under Section
58-68-301 or as a physician and surgeon under Section 58-67-301; and
(b)  who is able to lawfully and competently engage in the practice of
medicine to direct or interfere in the licensee's practice of medicine.
